Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1655
Tuition Recovery Cash Fund; administration.

The Tuition Recovery Cash Fund shall be administered by the board. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for the administration of the fund and for the evaluation and
approval of claims pursuant to section 85-1657.

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 53;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2860;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 55;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 20.